Utah statutes.
63J-4a-201.   Creation of office -- Inspector general -- Appointment -- Term.

(1)  There is created, within the Governor's Office of Planning and Budget, the Office of Inspector General of Medicaid Services.

(2)  The governor shall appoint the inspector general, with the advice and consent of the Senate.

(3)  A person appointed as the inspector general shall:

(a)  be a certified public accountant or a certified internal auditor; and

(b)  have the following qualifications:

(i)  a general knowledge of the type of methodology and controls necessary to audit, investigate, and identify fraud, waste, and abuse;

(ii)  strong management skills;

(iii)  extensive knowledge of, and at least seven years experience with, performance audit methodology;

(iv)  the ability to oversee and execute an audit; and

(v)  strong interpersonal skills.

(4)  The inspector general:

(a)  shall serve a term of two years; and

(b)  may be removed by the governor, for cause.

(5)  If the inspector general is removed for cause, a new inspector general shall be appointed, with the advice and consent of the Senate, to serve a two-year term.

